Illinois, session 104th, HB3040.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended by 5adding Section 17 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 205/17 new)7    Sec. 17. Illinois Higher Education Data Dashboard Report.8    (a) By January 15, 2027 and January 15 of each subsequent 9school year, the Board of Higher Education, in collaboration 10with the Illinois Community College Board and the Illinois 11Student Assistance Commission, shall prepare and release a 12State Data Dashboard Report and Data Dashboard Report for each 13public institution of higher education and each private 14college and university in the State.15    (b) The Board, in collaboration with the Illinois 16Community College Board and the Illinois Student Assistance 17Commission, shall determine the indicators and presentation of 18the State and institution data dashboard, which must include, 19at a minimum, the most current data collected and maintained 20by the Board, the Illinois Community College Board, and the 21Illinois Student Assistance Commission related to the 22following:23        (1) student demographics, including, but not limited   HB3040- 2 -LRB104 10576 LNS 20652 b1    to, racial, ethnic, gender, rural, English learners, and 2    adult students;3        (2) institution characteristics, including, but not 4    limited to, total students and total faculty and staff;5        (3) affordability characteristics, including, but not 6    limited to, cost of attendance including all categories of 7    tuition and fees, on-campus and off-campus housing cost 8    averages, and loan repayment rates;9        (4) student success factors, including, but not 10    limited to, applications, enrollments, retention, 11    completion, and to the extent possible the student 12    demographic breakdown of each category;13        (5) a comparison, where feasible, of data covering a 14    5-year period; and15        (6) any additional data as reasonably determined by 16    the Board.17    (c) The Board, in collaboration with the Illinois 18Community College Board and the Illinois Student Assistance 19Commission, shall publish a State Data Dashboard Report and 20Data Dashboard Report for each public institution of higher 21education and each private college and university in the State 22on a publicly available website.23    The Board may adopt any rules necessary to administer this 24Section.